District of Columbia statutes.
44-109.06

Medication management training program.

(a)

The Mayor shall develop medication management training courses which shall be approved by the Board of Nursing. The medication administration training program shall include instruction in the following areas:

(1)

Cuing, coaching, and monitoring residents who self-administer medications with or without assistance;

(2)

Pharmacology;

(3)

Terminology related to medication;

(4)

Procedures and precautions in administering medication;

(5)

Types of medication;

(6)

Actions, interactions, and effects of medication;

(7)

Administration of medication in emergency or life-threatening circumstances;

(8)

Recordkeeping, storage, handling, and disposal requirements for medications;

(9)

Rights of residents;

(10)

Monitoring of vital signs;

(11)

Federal and District of Columbia laws governing medication; and

(12)

Reference sources related to medication.

(b)

The Mayor shall maintain a list of approved medication administration courses for the training of persons to be certified by the District of Columbia as TMEs.

(c)

In order to maintain certification, every 2 years a TME shall successfully complete a clinical update or refresher course approved by the Mayor.

(d)

The ALA shall document completion of the medication training course in TME’s personnel file.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 906, 47 DCR 2647

Section References

This section is referenced in § 44-102.01.